District of Columbia statutes.
38-706

Expense of textbooks and supplies.

The Board of Education is authorized to provide for the necessary expenses of purchase, distribution, care, and preservation of said textbooks and educational supplies out of money appropriated under authority of this chapter.

History

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-706.
1973 Ed., § 31-406.